Tennessee, session 114, HB1257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101(g)(7), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subdivision:
The form must be available to the public on the website of the administrative office of the
courts.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1257
002372
- 1 -